Hawaii, session 2026, GM1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the statewide
automated victim information and notification system,
established under section 353-132, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and
administered by the department of corrections and
rehabilitation's victim notification services office, plays a
vital role in ensuring crime victims are promptly informed of
changes in an offender's custody status. The statewide
automated victim information and notification system provides
real-time notifications to victims and community members
regarding custody changes, parole hearings, and other key
events, and is essential for protecting victims' rights, safety,
and peace of mind. Demand for these services continues to grow,
with victim registrations increasing by 38.9 per cent between
fiscal year 2022-2023 and fiscal year 2024-2025 (from 42,182 to
58,606). The statewide automated victim information and
notification system is funded through the automated victim
2026-3323 HB2289 GDI HMSO

ll■lllll■■■ll■ll■■

Page 2 2289
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
information and notification system special fund established
under section 353-136, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
The legislature further finds that the existing $600,000
annual expenditure cap on the special fund has become outdated
and limits the victim notification services office's ability to
strengthen victim services, improve system infrastructure, and
support operational needs. Payroll costs continue to rise due
to collective bargaining increases, but the existing cap
prevents the department of corrections and rehabilitation from
adjusting allocations accordingly. As a result, payroll
increases reduce available operating funds for operations.
Operating expenses have also increased, including contract costs
for the system itself, which rose 9.17 per cent in fiscal year
2025-2026 (from $90,636 to $98,944) and are projected to grow by
three per cent annually in subsequent years. Rent, lease,
internet, and telephone costs have also risen.
Looking ahead, if all four authorized positions are filled,
projected expenditures will exceed the existing statutory
expenditure ceiling. The automated victim information and
notification system special fund has a cash balance of more than
$1,500,000. Removing the expenditure cap will ensure the victim
2026-3323 HB2289 CDl HMSO

liiiinniBiiiiininiiin

Page 3 2289
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D, 1
notification services office can sustain operations demands,
support staff salaries, and maintain uninterrupted services
statewide.
The purpose of this Act is to repeal the statutory-
expenditure ceiling on the automated victim information and
notification system special fund.
SECTION 2. Section 353-136, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-{•] §353-136 [-}-] Automated victim infozrmation and
notification system special fund; authorization of payment. (a)
There is established a special fund to be known as the automated
victim information and notification system special fund, to be
administered by the department. Interest and investment
earnings credited to the assets of the fund shall become part of
the fund. Any remaining balance in the fund at the end of any
fiscal year shall be carried over to the next fiscal year.
(b) Any item purchased by an in-state or out-of-state
inmate from a correctional facility commissary shall be subject
to a four per cent surcharge on the item's price. The proceeds
from the surcharge shall be deposited into the automated victim
information and notification system special fund.
2026-3323 HB2289 GDI HMSO

iiiiiiiiNiniiNiiiiiiiiiiin

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) All proceeds or revenues that are derived from any
commission that is realized pursuant to a telephone service
agreement executed by the department for the provision of
telephone services for inmates shall be deposited into the
automated victim information and notification system special
fund.
(d) Moneys received pursuant to subsections (b) and (c)
shall be used for the development and operating expenses,
including salaries and benefits of positions as authorized by
the legislature, of the system.
[-(e^-----The sum total of all moneys expended for dovolopmcnt
and operating expenses,—inc-luding—salaries and benefits of
positions as author-i-zed by -the legi-oiaturc,—shall not exceed the
special fund eealing related to the-fund established-by-the
legislature-;—provided that the total moneys -expended for these
purposes—shall not exceed $600,000—i-n—any—©ne—fiscal—year.
-(- f-hl (e) Federal funds shall not be transferred to, or
deposited into, the automated victim information and
notification system special fund."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-3323 HB2289 CDl HMSO
liiinillMlliHIIIOiiHl

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3323 HB2289 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO. 2289
±
W
d
Q
Q
D
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2289, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2289, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
99-26